languages/apertium-gla/apertium-gla.gla.dix
    <pardef n="bhliadhna__n_f">
      <e><par n="bliadhna__n_f"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="uair__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ean</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="o/bair__n_f">
      <e><p><l>bair</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bair</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>brach</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ibre</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bair</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>braichean</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>braichean</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>braichean</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>braichean</l><r>bair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ru/d__n_m">
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>id</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dan</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dan</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dan</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dan</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>







    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="seo__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="eile__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dìr/each__adj">
      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>each</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eacha</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eacha</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eacha</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eacha</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iche</l><r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/math__adj">
      <e><p><l>math</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mhath</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>mhath</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mhaith</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>mhaith</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mhaithe</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mhaith</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>mhaith</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mhath</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>matha</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>matha</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>matha</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>matha</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>fheàrr</l><r>math<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ù/r__adj">
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ire</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="len"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>r<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="suas__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="càite__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="/is__vbser">
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>a<s n="rel"/><j/>is<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>is<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="dep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bu</l><r>is<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>b'</l><r>is<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bu</l><r>is<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>b'</l><r>is<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/><s n="indep"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bliadhna"><p><l>bhliadhna</l><r>bliadhna</r></p><par n="bhliadhna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="uair"><p><l>uair</l><r>uair</r></p><par n="uair__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="obair"><p><l>o</l><r>o</r></p><par n="o/bair__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rud"><p><l>ru</l><r>ru</r></p><par n="ru/d__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seo"><i>seo</i><par n="seo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sin"><i>sin</i><par n="seo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="siud"><i>siud</i><par n="seo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="siud" r="LR"><p><l>ud</l><r>siud</r></p><par n="seo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eile"><i>eile</i><par n="eile__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="math"><i></i><par n="/math__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ùr"><i>ù</i><par n="ù/r__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="càite"><i>càite</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="carson"><i>carson</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cuine"><i>cuine</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ciamar"><i>ciamar</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="suas"><i>suas</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="idir"><i>idir</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dìreach"><i>dìreach</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cuideachd"><i>cuideachd</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="a-mach"><i>a-mach</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="co-dhiubh"><i>co-dhiubh</i><par n="suas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="is"><i></i><par n="/is__vbser"/></e>
